Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-142
Department; airports; easements; acquire by condemnation.

Where necessary, in order to provide unobstructed air space for the landing and taking off of aircraft utilizing airports and restricted landing areas acquired or operated under the provisions of sections 3-101 to 3-154, it is hereby granted authority to acquire, in the same manner as is provided for the acquisition of property for airport purposes, easements through or other interests in air space over land or water, interest in airport hazards outside the boundaries of the airports or restricted landing areas and such other airport protection privileges as are necessary to insure safe approaches to the landing areas of said airports and restricted landing areas and the safe and efficient operation thereof. It is also hereby authorized to acquire, in the same manner, the right or easement, for a term of years or perpetually, to place or maintain suitable marks for the daytime marking and suitable lights for the nighttime marking of airport hazards, including the right of ingress and egress to or from such airport hazards for the purpose of maintaining and repairing such lights and marks. This authority shall not be so construed as to limit the right, power or authority of the state or any municipality to zone property adjacent to any airport or restricted landing area pursuant to any law of this state.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 11(2), p. 97.